ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/sl_SI/hyph_sl_SI.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN ',’
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
7-/=-,1,1
.e2
.enako3sti
.e1na
.enak4
.ena1ko
.enakost2
.e1no1
.et1r
.na3kl2j
.nava3dn
.na1v2a
.nazad3
.na1za
.naš1l
.no3sn2i.
.a2
.a4no
.a4ni
.av3
.asi1s2
.a1si
.ameri4š3kih
.a1me
.ame1ri
.ameri1šk
.k2
.kas3ne1je
.konč3ne
.konč1n
.koris3tij
.ko1ri
.korist2
.kos3ti
.kost2
.krog3le
.krog3la
.1kr2ši
.krš2
.k1li1
.o2
.o2n2s
.od1n
.odvis3n2o.
.o2dv2
.od1vi
.odvis3ni
.od3pre.
.od1p
.od2pre
.o2g1n
.og1ra
.o4pr
.op4ra1ve
.opu3šče1no
.op1l
.os3krbi
.oskr1b
.osk2
.os3vo1b
.osre1
.os3reč
.os1le
.os3li
.os1ta
.ost2
.o1te1
.ot1re
.ob3ran
.ob3ril
.ob3ri1t
.obiš1
.ozem3lja
.ozeml2j
.ozem3lju
.oz3nan
.oš1t
.v2
.verje3t
.ver1j
.ved1n
.ves3ti
.vest2
.več2k
.več3je
.ve3čjim
.varnos3ti
.1v2a
.var1n
.varnost2
.vod3n2i.
.voz1n
.vo1z
.vr2
.vr3stn
.vrs2
.vrst2
.vr3st2a.
.vi1dn
.1vi
.vzhod3n
.vz2
.r2
.rek3l2a.
.rek3lo
.re1dn
.re3g
.re1p
.res3n2o.
.re1st2
.rez1l
.ras1l
.ras3ti
.rast2
.ra3zne
.ra3zna
.ra3zni
.razdeli4t3v
.razd2
.raz1de
.razde1li
.razdeli1t
.razum3l
.1ra1zu
.rod1n
.ru1
.d2
.de1žn
.1de
.dej1s
.do4stoj
.1do
.dost2
.dr2žal
.dr1ža
.dr2ža1t
.dr2ži1t
.dr1ži
.i2
.io2n1s
.i1o1
.ir1s2
.ig3ra2l.
.ig3ra1li
.is3kan
.isk2
.is1ta
.ist2
.is3tri
.is1ti
.iz1n
.iz1ku1
.izk2
.iz3o1gi
.iz1vo
.izv2
.iš1
.u2
.ugo3dn
.up1n
.us3pe2h.
.1usp2
.us3peš3no
.us3t2a.
.ust2
.us4tavi1t
.u2sta3vi
.us1to
.učenos3ti
.uče1no
.učenost2
.g2
.gos3ta
.gost2
.go3st2o.
.go3st2i.
.gos3tih
.grad3n
.g2lob3l
.p2
.pad1l
.pa1me1
.pop4
.po3sre3dno
.po1tn
.poz3n2a.
.po3zna1na
.po3zna3ni
.poz3nam
.po3zno
.pom3ni2l.
.poš3te1no
.pred3n
.pro3ste.
.prost2
.pro3ste1g
.3p4ros3ta
.pros3tos4
.p4rosto
.pros3t2i.
.pros2ti
.pro3stih
.prijet3n
.pri1je
.pu3ščan
.le1p
.le1po1
.le1t
.le4t3nih
.las3ti
.last2
.laž1n
.lis3to
.1li
.list2
.ljub3lje
.l2j
.ljubl2j
.h2
.hi4t3re1je
.1hi
.hi1t
.s2
.sab1l
.1sab
.skrb3n2o.
.sk2
.skrb2no
.skrb1n
.skr2bi
.sre4d3nj2i.
.sre3dn2j
.srč3
.splo3šne
.sp2
.sle3d
.smr3tno
.smrt2n
.smr2ti
.t2
.tek1l
.tep3l
.te3mnej
.tas1
.to1p
.topni3
.to1žn
.1tres3t2
.trez3n
.tr2ga
.1trg2
.tr2p2i.
.tr2t
.ti2s1t2
.ča1sn
.čr2t2i.
.1čr
.čr1ti
.či1š
.b2
.bes3na
.bes3ni
.bivali3šče
.1biv
.bi1v2a
.biva1li
.bivališ3ča
.z2
.ze2m3lje.
.ze1mlje
.zeml2j
.zem3lja
.zad1n
.1za
.zahod3ne
.za1ho
.zahod3no
.zahod3n2i.
.zr2
.ž2
.žr2
.m2
.mes1n
.mes3ti
.mest2
.mem1
.mor2s2
.1mo
.mog1l
.mo3žne
.mož3no2s2t.
.možnost2
.mo3žni
.mom1
.mr2
.miš1l
.1mi
.1mu1
.jas3no
.ces3te
.cest2
.ces3t2a.
.ces3ti
e1e
ee4na
eenakos3ti
eenak4
eena1ko
eenakost2
e1ne
ene3s2li
enes1l
e1na
enak4
enavad3ne
ena1v2a
enavad3n2i.
ena1za1
enaj3sti
enajst2
e1no
eno1vl
eno2g1
eno1sn
en2dr
en1d2
e1ni
eni1š
e1nu
en3skim
e2ns
ensk2
en4stve
en1st2
enst2v
e1n2j
e1a
ealno3sti
eal1n
ealnost2
e1ke
ek1n
e1ka
eka1k2
ekaz1
e1kre
ek1ra
ek1ri
e1ku
ek1lel
ek1lal
ek1lji
ekl2j
ek3so
e1ksi
ek1m
ek1j
e1o
eor1s2
eod1vi1
eo2dv2
eo1g
eos1
eo3s4talih
eos1tal
eost2
eosta1li
eo1br1n
eo3bra1t
eob1l
eob1ču4
eob1č
eobčut3
eo1m
e1ve
everjet3n
ever1j
eve3dno2s2t.
evednost2
eve1d2l
eve3sto
evest2
eves3ti
eve1š
evno3st2j
ev1n
evno2st2
evarnos3ti
e1v2a
evar1n
evarnost2
ev1ku
e1vo
evo1dn
evos3ti
evost2
evred3
ev3re1de
evid3ni
e1vi
e1vu1
ev3la1da
e3vla1do
e1vlja
evl2j
ev1z2
ev1c
e1re
ereno3sti
ere1no
erenost2
ernos3ti
er1n
ernost2
e1ra
eras1l
e1ra1zu1
e1ro
ero1d
eroš1k
er1ve
e2rv
er1vo
er1v2j
e1ri
eri3t
eri4ških
eri1šk
e1ru
er1sk2
ers2
er1te
er1t2n
er1to
er1m
er1c
ed4en
e1de
ed3nos3ti
ednost2
edno3st2j
ed3ni1ke
edni1š
e1dni1c
e3dnja
edn2j
e1dn1jo
edo2n1s
e1do
e2d1v2
ed1re
ed1ram
ediš3če.
e1di
ediš2
ediš3ča
ediš3ču
ed2lo
e3dlo1gi
e3dloži3t
edlo1ži
edho3
ed1h
e2ds
ed3st1vi
edst2
edst2v
e1d2ž2
e1i
ei1s
eizkuš3n
eizk2
eiz1ku
ei1zo
ei1m
eiš1
e1u
eu1r
eugod1
eu1p
eus2
eu3speh
e1usp2
euspe3š
eu3spešn
eu3stre
eust2
eu1sm
eut1
eu1č
eum1no
eu1mr
e1g
eg1na
e2gn
eg1no
eg1ni1t
eg1reš
eg1rin
e2gl
e3gle2d.
e3gledn
e3gled2a.
egle1da
eg3ledal
e3gleda1t
e3gledom
egle1do
e3g2le1di
e3gledu.
egle1du
eg1la
eg1lo
e1pe
e1pne
e1pna
e1pno
e1pn2i.
ep1nik
e1pa
e1po
epo1k
epo1vr
epos3red3no
epo1t2
epoz3n2a.
epoz3nan
epo3z3na1t
epo3znam
epoz3no
epo1š
e1prek
e1pred
e1pre1s
ep1ret
ep3re1ma
e3pravilne
e2pra3vi
epravil1n
ep3ravič
ep3ros
epros3te
eprost2
e3p4ro3sta
e3pro3sto2s2t.
ep4rosto
eprostos4
eprostost2
epros3ti
ep1rip1
ep1ris
ep3rič
ep3rim
e1prij
epri1je3
e1pi
epi2t3v
epi1t
e1pu
epuš1
e3ple1ta
ep1la
e1plo
ep1ti
ele1po1
ele4s3ne
eles3no
ele3sni
ele1z
elež1n
eleš1
e1la
e1lo
elot1n
elikos3ti
e1li
eli1ko
elikost2
eli1šč
e1lu
e1lče
elč2
e1lje
el2j
e1lja
e1lji
elji1š
e1lju
elj3st2
e2ljs
e1he
e1ho
eho1t
e1hr
ese3g2
e1se
e4sne
es1nel
es1nem
esno3sti
esnost2
e1snil
es1n2j
e1sa
e1sko
esk2
e1ski
e2skl
es1v
es3re1če
es3reč1n
e3sre1či
e1sra
e1si
e1su
es1pa
esp2
es1pok
esploš3
es1le
es1lo
e1sliš
es1li
es1tev
est2
es1te1g
es1tem
e3stn2i.
e3sta3ne
e3stanku1
e2stan1k
e3stav
e4stavl
esta3vlje
estavl2j
es4ta3vlj2a.
es3tav3lja1la
e4s3ta4v3lja1li
e4s3tav1lja1t
es3tav1ljaj
es1tal
e1stah
es1taj
es1top
e3s4to2p.
es3to2l.
es3to1la
es3to1lu1
es1tom
e1s1toj
e3str2a.
e3straše2n.
estra1še
e3straši1t
estra1ši
e1stro
e1stri
e1stru
e3sti1la
es1tih
e1sti1t
es1tu
e1stje
est2j
es2m
es3misl
es1mi
e1te
ete1p
ete1ž
et1naj
etnaj3sti
etnajst2
et3nos3tih
etnost2
e2t3nos2tm
et1nim
e1tn2j
e1ta
e1to
et3v2a
et2v
e3tvarjati
et4varja1t
etvar1j
e1tvo
et3vi
et3resel
etre1se
et3re1sa
e3tre1so
et3res1l
e1tre3st2
e1tr1p
etr1te
etr1to
e1ti
etit3v
eti1t
e1tu
et1la
e3tljiv.
etl2j
e4t3lji1vo
e1t1jo
et2j
e1če
e1ča
e1čo
e1či
ečin2
ečiš1
eč1j2i.
eč1jih
e1be
ebe3sn
ebno3sti
eb1n
ebnost2
ebno3st2j
e1bo
e1brne
ebr1n
e1brni
eb1ra
eb1rom
e1bri
eb1ru.
e1bi
ebivališ3če
e1biv
ebi1v2a
ebiva1li
ebivali3šča
e1bu
eb1l
e1bje
e1bju
e1ze
e1zne
e3zna2n.
ez3nane.
ezna3ne
ez3na1na
ez3na3no
e3znan2i.
ezna3ni
ez3nanim
e1znam
e4zni1ki
e1znik
ez1nu
ezano3sti
e1za
eza3no
ezanost2
eza1ve1
ezad1n
eza1do1
eza1s2
e1zo
ez1v2
ezves1
e1zr
ez1dn
ezd2
ez1dje
ezd1j
e1zi
e1zg
ezgo1
ez1po
e3zlji1ve
ezl2j
ez1m
ez2mo1
ež1ne1g
ežnos4
ežno3sti
ežnost2
e1žnje
ežn2j
e1žnja
ež1n1jo
ež1nji
ež1iš
e1ži
ež1l
e1me
emes3t2i.
emest2
em1n2i.
em1nil
e1ma
emo3žni
e1mo
emi3šljen
e1mi
emišl2j
emiš3lja
em1le
e1mlje
eml2j
em3lja2l.
em2ljal
e3mlji1vo
em3st1v2a
emst2
emst2v
emb2ne.
emb1n
e1je
e1ja
ejan4
eja1s
e1ji
e1ju
ej1sk2
ej3šnj2i.
ej1š
ej2šn
ejšn2j
eš1ne.
e1šnej
eš1n2i.
e1šnih
eša1s
e1ša
eško2d1
eš1l
eš1te
e4šče1na
e1ščev
e1ščan
eš1č2i.
e3šči1ne
eš3či1no
eš3či1ni
e1f
e1ce
e1ci
2n.
ne1na1
1nek
ne1ko
ne1ki
neob1
ne1o
1neval
ne1v2a
1nevam
3nevajoč
neva1jo
ner1s2
1ned
ne2g1l
ne1g
ne1pl
ne1le
ne1sn
ne1sk2
nes1l
nes1ti
nest2
ne1tn
ne1t2j
ne1z1m
než1ne
než1na
ne1žno1
než1ni
3nejšem
nej1š
nej1še
1neš
ne1šk
1nec
nano3sti
na3no
nanost2
1nanil
na3ni
1nani1t
nanč3
1na3nja
na1n2j
nak1le
na1k2la
naok1r
na1o
1nav2a.
na1v2a
3naval
4naval1c
1na3va1t
3navajoč
nava1jo
na4vl
na3vlj2a.
navl2j
1nar
na1re1
1nad
nad1n2j
na2d1r
nag4n2j
na2gn
na1pri
nas3lon
na1ste
nast2
na1sto
na1sti
na2t1n
na1t
1nata
3nače1na
na1če
3načiti
na1či
nači1t
na1be
naz1n
na1zi
nam1n
3namova2l.
na1mo
namo1v2a
3namova1li
namiš1
na1mi
1na2j.
n1k
nkos3ti
nkost2
n2kr
n3kratn
nkra1t
nku1
non3ski
no2ns
nonsk2
1no1a
no1k
no1o1
novo3sti
no1vo
novost2
no1vr1
1novid
no1vi
no3vlje1ne
novl2j
nov3lje1no
no1rd2
nog3ra1da
no3gra1di
nog3ra1du
no1p
3noli1ke
no1li
3noli1ki
nos1no
no1sa
no1stn
nost2
no1sm
1no1te
notno3sti
notnost2
no2t1ni
no1t2j
no1če
1nob
nobnos3
nob1n
nož1n
1nom
no1me
no1mn
no1ml
n1v
nve1s
1nr
n1d2
ndo2n1s
n1do
nd3vi
n2dv2
ni1kl
ni1vo1
1niv2i.
ni1vi
nir1s2
ni3g
nis1ta
nist2
1nitem
ni1t
1nito
nito3sti
nitost2
ni2t2v
nit3vi
ni2t3j
ničnos4
nič1n
3nično2s2t.
ničnost2
nič3no3s3ti
3ničnih
3ničnim
niž1n
3ništvom
ništ2v
nu1k
nu1dn
n2u1l
nus1n
nu1te
nu1tn
nu1ta
nu1to
n1g2
n1l
2ns
n1sa
n1sp2
n1st2
n1t
nte1k
n2tnih
nta1s
ntimno3
nti1mn
ntu1
n1če
nč2ne1g
nč1n
nč2nem
nč2nej
nč2n2o.
n1ča
nčas1
n1či
n1čj
n1z
n1ž
n2j
2n2j.
2nje1ti
1nje1mu
1nja1ko
njak2
1njam
2nj1k
2n3jo3sti
n1jo
njost2
1njič
1njim.
2nj1s
nj2st2
2nj1š
n1š
n1f
2n1c
n2c2h
2a.
a1e
ael1s
ael2ske
aelsk2
a3ne
a1na
anav1
anaj3sto
anajst2
an3kr
an1k
a3no
ano3vlje2n.
anovl2j
anov3lje1na
ano3vlje1ni
a3ni
ani1s
ani1š
a3nu
a2n1s
a1n2j
a3nje
anjenos3ti
anje1no
anjenost2
a3nja
a3nju
a1ke
ak1n
a1ka
a1ko
ak1r2a.
a4kra2t.
akra1t
ak1ro
ak1ri
a1ki
a1ku
ak1la
ak3lo
a3klju1če
akl2j
ak3ljučni
aključ1n
a3ključ2i.
aklju1či
ak3ljuči2l.
a3ključi1la
a3ključuje.
aklju1ču
aključu1je
a1ks
a1o
ao1ko
aos2
ao3stan
aost2
ao3s1tal
aos3taj
aob1
a1ve
aves3ti
avest2
ave1ti1
avno3stih
av1n
avno2st2
avni1š
av4an
a1v2a
av1ku
a1vo
a1vre
av1rač
a1vrg2
a1vr1t
a3vi
avir1s2
avi3t2ni
avi2t1n
avi1t
a1vu1
av1lo
av4lje1n2j
avl2j
a3v3ljenju
a3vljan
av1č
av3ze2l.
avz2
a3vze1la
av3ze1li1
av3ze1to
av3ze1ti
a3vze1m2a.
avze1ma
a3vzemaj
av1zv2
av1m
av1c
a1re
arni1š
ar1n
a1ra
ara1s
araš1č
a1ro
aro1d
aros3ti
arost2
ar1ve
a2rv
ar1vo
ar1dn
ard2
ar3do
a1ri
ari2t3v
ari1t
a1ru
ar3hu
ar1s2
ar1te
ar1t2n
ar1to
ar1m
ar1c
adež1n
a1de
a1dna
a3dn2o.
a4dni1ko
a1dnih
ad1ni1c
a3d2njim
adn2j
ado2sto
a1do
adost2
ad1vo
a2dv2
a1dr
adi1š2
a1di
ad1s
a1d2ž2
a1i
ai2n
ai1g
a1u1
austa1
aust2
aus3tav2i.
au2sta3vi
aus3tavil
au3s4tavi1t
ag1na
a2gn
a3gni
ag1nu
a3gnje1na
ag1n2j
a1go
agod1n
ago4s1
a1greb
ag1reš
a3gra2d.
a3gra1de
a3gra1da
ag3ra1do
a2g3ra1di
ag3raje2n.
agra1je
a3graje1na
a3graje1ni
ag1ro
ag1le.
a3gled2a.
agle1da
ag3ledal
ag1l2a.
ag1lav
a1glas
ag1lo
ag1l2j
a1pe
ap1no
a1pni
a1pa
apad1l
apas1
a1po
apos3tav3
apost2
apom1
a1pre.
ap1rek
apred4
a3pre1de
a3pre3dn
ap1ret
ap1rej
ap1reš
ap3ra
a3p4ra1ve
a3p4ra1v2a
a3p4ra1vo
aprav3l
ap3rosi1li
apro1si
ap3rosi1t
ap1rot
ap1r2i.
ap1ris
a1pr1li
a1pi
a1pu
apu3s4ti1t
apus1ti
apust2
apuš3če1no
apuš4če1ni
apu3ščen2i.
ap1t
a1le
ale1s
ale3žna
a1la
a1lo
alos3ti
alost2
aloš1
ali2t3v
a1li
ali1t
a1lu
al1ček
alč2
a1lje
al2j
aljeno3sti
alje1no
aljenost2
a1lja
a1lji
a1lju
alju1b
a1he
a1ho
ahod3ne.
aho3dnih
ahot1
ah3v
ah1re
ah1ra
ases1
a1se
as1nem
a1sna
a3sno1ve
a3snov2a.
as3no1v2a
a3snova2n.
a3snova1na
a3sno1vo
as1nos
asnos3ti
asnost2
as3ni2l.
as1nih
as1nim
as1nje
asn2j
a1sa
a1ske
ask2
a1ska
a1sko
as1ve
a3sveti2l.
as4vetil
asve1ti
a1svo
as1r
a1si
asis2
a1su
as1pal
asp2
a1spl
as3le4d3nje
asledn2j
a3sle4dnja
as3led3nj2i.
as3led3njih
a3slednjim
as3le1di
as1lep
a1slov
a3slišan
as1li
asli1ša
a3slu2g.
a3slu3žn
as3luži1le
aslu1ži
as3luži1li
as3lužite
asluži1t
a3služiti
as3lužim
as1ten
ast2
as1te1g
a1steh
ast3nos3t2i.
astnost2
as3tane.
asta3ne
a3sta1nek
a3stanej
a3stan1k
a3stani3t
asta3ni
as3tav
a3s4ta1ve
a3sta1v2a
a3stavitev
as4tavi1t
asta3vi
astav3l
as3tal
a3s4ta1le
a3staj2a.
asta1ja
as3taja2l.
a3staja1la
a3staja1t
a3stajaj
a2s1t2o.
a3sto1ra
as3tor1j
a4s4to1p2a.
asto1pa
a2s3to1p2i.
asto1pi
as1tir
as3ti1lo
as1ti1t
astit3v
as1tim
a3stl
as2ma
a1sc
a1t
atek1l
a2t1nem
a2tno
at1nos1
ata1s
a2t3v
at1re
a2t1ral
at1ro
a3tr1j
ativno3
ativ1n
ati1šč
a1tiš
at3je
at2j
a2t1f
a1če
a1ča
a1čo
a1čr1
a1či
a1bo
abo1ž
ab1r
a1bi
a1bu
a3blje1na
abl2j
ab3s
a1ze
a1znav
a1zna1t
az1nos
aznos3ti
aznost2
a1zniv
a1znih
a1znim
azanos3ti
a1za
aza3no
azanost2
a1zo
a4zoč
az1ve
azv2
a1zvo
az1vr
azvr1s2
az1ra
az1go
az1gra1
az3gle2d.
az1p
azpad3l
az1pa
az3pra
az1l
az1te3
azte1g2
az1b2
az1m
až1ne
až1ni
a1me
ames3til
amest2
amet3ne
ame4t3nos
amet3ni
ame4š3če1na
ame1šč
am1ne
am1n2i.
am1nih
a3mnite.
amni1t
a3mnita
a3mniti
a1ma
a3mr
amis4
a1mi
ami3s4l2i.
amis1li
ami3s3li2l.
amiš3lje
amišl2j
ami3šlja
am3ljen2o.
aml2j
amlje1no
a1je
a2j1ek
aje2t3j
a1ja
a1ji
a1ju.
aj1ske
ajsk2
aj1ski
aš1ne
aš1na
aš1no
aš1nih
aš1nim
a3šnje.
ašn2j
aš3nje1g
a1šnja
a1šn1jo
aš3nj2i.
a1šk
aš1le
aš1lo
aš1tev
aš1tel
a3šte1te
aš1tej
aš1če
a3š2če1ni
a3šča2l.
